Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5052.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17a. (1) If the conditions prescribed in described under subsection (2) are met, notwithstanding any children's camp policy to the contrary, a minor child may possess and use 1 or more of the following at the children's camp, on camp-sponsored transportation, or at any activity, event, or program sponsored by the children's camp or in which the minor child is participating: (a) A metered dose inhaler or a dry powder inhaler to alleviate asthmatic symptoms or for use before exercise to prevent the onset of asthmatic symptoms. (b) An epinephrine auto-injector delivery system or epinephrine inhaler to treat anaphylaxis. (2) Subsection (1) applies to a minor child if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The minor child has written approval to possess and use the inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system as described in subsection (1) from the minor child's physician or other health care provider authorized by law to prescribe an inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system and from the minor child's parent or legal guardian. (b) The director or other chief administrator of the minor child's camp has received a copy of each written approval required under subdivision (a) for the minor child. (c) There is on file at the children's camp a written emergency care plan that contains specific instructions for the minor child's needs, that is prepared by a licensed physician in collaboration with the minor child and the minor child's parent or legal guardian, and that is updated as necessary for changing circumstances. (3) A children's camp or an owner, director, or employee of a children's camp is not liable for damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly arising from either of the following: (a) An employee of the children's camp having prohibited a minor child from using an inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system because the conditions prescribed in subsection (2) had not been satisfied. (b) An employee of the children's camp having permitted a minor child to use or possess an inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system because the conditions prescribed in subsection (2) had been satisfied. (4) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a camp or an owner, director, or employee of a camp may have under other state law. (5) A children's camp may request a minor child's parent or legal guardian to provide an extra inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to designated camp personnel for use in case of emergency. A parent or legal guardian is not required to provide an extra inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to camp personnel. (6) A director or other chief administrator of a children's camp who is aware that a minor child possesses an inhaler or epinephrine auto-injector delivery system as authorized under this section shall notify each camp employee who supervises the minor child of that fact and of the provisions of this section. (7) As used in this section, "epinephrine delivery system" means that term as defined in section 17744a of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17744a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5054 (request no. H02192'25). (b) House Bill No. 5049 (request no. H02193'25). (c) House Bill No. 5050 (request no. H02479'25). (d) House Bill No. 5051 (request no. H02911'25). (e) House Bill No. 5053 (request no. H03176'25).